Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
Article 5. Mississippi Commission on Marine Resources.

§ 49-15-301.
Mississippi Commission on Marine Resources; powers and duties; membership; chairman; rules and regulations; marine resources technical advisory council; definitions.

The Mississippi Commission on Marine Resources is hereby established and full power is vested in the commission to regulate all matters pertaining to all saltwater aquatic life and marine resources. The commission shall administer the Coastal Wetlands Protection Law and the Public Trust Tidelands Act. The power and duties of the commission shall be exercised through the Department of Marine Resources.

On July 1, 2002, the commission shall be reconstituted. The terms of the nonseafood industry member and the member of the Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks shall expire July 1, 2002. The remaining five (5) members serving on July 1, 2002 shall compose the reconstituted commission and shall continue to serve until the expiration of their terms. The reconstituted Mississippi Commission on Marine Resources shall consist of five (5) members to be appointed as follows:

The Governor shall appoint five (5) members who shall be residents of Jackson, Harrison and Hancock Counties with the advice and consent of the Senate. The Governor shall appoint at least one (1) member from each county but not more than two (2) members from any one (1) county. The members designated in subparagraphs (i), (ii) and (iv) must be a resident of the county where the business he is appointed to represent is located.

The commission shall be composed as follows:

One (1) member shall be a commercial seafood processor.

One (1) member shall be a commercial fisherman.

One (1) member shall be a recreational sports fisherman.

One (1) member shall be a charter boat operator.

One (1) member shall be a member of an incorporated nonprofit environmental organization.

Of the initial members appointed by the Governor, the members designated in subparagraphs (i),(ii) and (iii) shall serve for an initial term of two (2) years and one (1) member shall be appointed from each county. The members designated in subparagraphs (iv) and (v) shall serve an initial term of four (4) years. All terms after the initial terms shall be for a period of four (4) years.

Any vacancy in the office of an appointed member of the commission shall be filled by appointment by the Governor for the balance of the unexpired term.

Each member shall have a demonstrated history of involvement in the matter of jurisdiction for which he is appointed to represent and his employment and activities must not conflict with the matter of jurisdiction represented. A member shall not have a record of conviction of violation of fish and game or seafood laws or regulations within the five (5) years preceding his appointment or a record of any felony conviction. After July 1, 1999, if a member is convicted of a violation of the seafood laws during his term, his office shall be deemed vacant and the Governor shall fill the vacancy as provided in this section.

The commission shall elect a chairman who shall preside at all meetings of the commission, and the commission shall also elect a vice-chairman who shall serve in the absence or inability of the chairman.

Each member shall be paid actual and necessary expenses incurred in attending meetings of the commission and in performing his duties away from his domicile under assignment by the commission. In addition, members shall receive the per diem authorized in Section 25-3-69, Mississippi Code of 1972.

The commission shall adopt rules and regulations governing times and places of meetings and shall adopt bylaws governing the manner of conducting its business. Each member shall take the oath prescribed by Section 268 of the Mississippi Constitution of 1890 and shall, before assuming office, enter into bond in the amount of Thirty Thousand Dollars ($30,000.00), to be approved by the Secretary of State conditioned according to law and payable to the State of Mississippi.

The commission shall not take any action, except by vote in meeting assembled, and such action shall be included in the minutes of the commission. A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum of the commission.

The commission, through the Department of Marine Resources, shall devise a plan to make licenses available in each coastal county.

There is hereby created a marine resources technical advisory council composed of the Executive Director of the Gulf Coast Research Lab, or his designee; the Executive Director of the Department of Environmental Quality, or his designee; and the Executive Director of the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, or his designee.

The council shall give technical assistance to the commission.

For purposes of this section the following definitions apply:

“Charter boat operator” means an individual who operates a vessel for hire guiding sports fishermen for a fee and is duly licensed to engage in such activity in the State of Mississippi.

“Commercial fisherman” means a fisherman who sells, barters or exchanges any or all of his catch or who is paid for attempting to catch marine species, and is duly licensed to engage in commercial fishing.

“Commercial seafood processor” means an individual who engages in the business of purchasing seafood products and preparing them for resale and who is duly licensed to engage in such commercial activity in the State of Mississippi.

“Incorporated environmental nonprofit organization” means an organization duly incorporated in any state as a nonprofit organization and whose stated goals and purposes are the conservation of natural resources.

“Recreational sports fisherman” means an individual who catches or harvests marine species only for recreation or personal consumption and not for sale. The individual must possess a saltwater sports fishing license, be a member of an incorporated nonprofit sports fishing organization and not possess a commercial fishing or seafood processor license.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 578, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 585, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 49-15-303.
Powers and duties of commission.

The commission shall have the following powers and duties:

To formulate the policy of the department regarding marine resources within the jurisdiction of the department;

To enter into and authorize the executive director to execute contracts, grants and cooperative agreements with any public or private institution, federal or state agency or any subdivision thereof to carry out the duties of the commission;

To adopt, amend or repeal any rules and regulations necessary for the operation of the commission and the department necessary for the protection, conservation and propagation of seafood, and necessary for the management of commercial and recreational taking of seafood; and

To discharge other duties and powers as are necessary to implement state policy regarding marine resources.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 578, § 2; Laws, 1999, ch. 558, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 21, 1999.).

§ 49-15-304.
Promulgation of regulations regarding marine resources.

The commission may adopt, modify or repeal rules or regulations to utilize, manage, conserve, preserve and protect the flora, fauna, tidelands, coastal wetlands, coastal preserves, marine waters and any other matter pertaining to marine resources under its jurisdiction. Rules and regulations adopted by the commission shall be consistent with the public policy expressed in Section 29-15-3 (public trust tidelands), Section 39-7-3 (antiquities and historic preservation), Section 49-15-1 (seafood), Section 49-17-3 (pollution control), Section 49-27-3 (coastal wetlands protection) and Section 57-15-6 (coastal zone management). The commission may make exceptions to and grant variances from any rules and regulations adopted by the commission. The commission shall give due consideration to permissable uses of the natural resources within its jurisdiction when promulgating rules and regulations.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 618, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 23, 2000.).

§ 49-15-305.
Executive director; nomination; powers and duties.

The commission shall submit three (3) nominees for the position of executive director to the Governor. The Governor shall appoint the executive director from the list of nominees with the advice and consent of the Senate. The commission may remove the executive director from office for good cause. The executive director shall be knowledgeable and experienced in marine resources management.

The executive director of the department shall have the following powers and duties:

To supervise and direct all administrative, inspection and technical activities and personnel of the department;

To employ qualified professional personnel in the subject matter or fields, and any other technical and clerical staff as may be required for the operation of the department;

To coordinate all studies in the State of Mississippi concerned with the supply, development, use and conservation of marine resources;

To prepare and deliver to the Legislature and the Governor on or before January 1 of each year, and at any other times as may be required by the Legislature or Governor, a full report of the work of the department, including a detailed statement of expenditures of the department and any recommendations the department may have;

To enter into cooperative agreements with any federal or state agency or subdivision thereof, or any public or private institution located inside or outside the State of Mississippi, or any person, corporation or association in connection with studies and investigations pertaining to marine resources, provided the agreements do not have a financial cost in excess of the amounts appropriated for the purposes by the Legislature; and

To carry out all regulations and rules adopted by the commission and enforce all licenses and permits issued by the department.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 578, § 4; Laws, 1999, ch. 558, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 21, 1999.).

§ 49-15-307.
Powers and duties of department.

The department shall have the following powers and duties:

To implement the policy of the commission regarding marine resources within the jurisdiction of the department;

To apply for, receive and expend any federal or state funds or contributions, gifts, devises, bequests or funds from any other source;

To commission or conduct studies designed to determine alternative methods of managing and conserving the marine resources of this state in a manner to insure efficiency and sustained productivity;

To issue permits and licenses authorized by law or regulation;

To equip and supply check stations, remote duty stations and personnel for extended duty;

To develop programs to enhance the marketing of the state’s recreational and commercial marine resources;

To provide gear, insignias, and otherwise equip personnel subject to the amount appropriated for those purposes; and

To discharge any other duties, responsibilities and powers as are necessary to implement this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 578, § 5; Laws, 1999, ch. 558, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 21, 1999.).

§ 49-15-309.
Establishment of saltwater recreational fishing record list.

The department is hereby authorized and directed to establish and maintain a saltwater recreational fishing record list of marine fish taken in the state.

The department shall direct fisheries biologists of the department to seek records from fishing rodeos, tournaments or other valid sources of the largest fish of each marine species commonly occurring in the waters of the state.

The department shall declare the initial listing as the official state saltwater records.

The department shall establish criteria for maintaining and updating the official records list.

The department is hereby directed to present all state record holders with a certification of achievement in marine recreational fishing.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 578, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 49-15-311.
Authority of department to purchase physical loss and liability coverage insurance.

The department may obtain and pay on coverage for physical loss and liability upon any vehicle or aircraft owned or under control of the department. The department may determine the limits of each insurance policy.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 578, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 49-15-313.
Saltwater sports fishing license; separate annual license for charter boat fishing, party boat fishing, head boat and guide boat fishing; proof of random drug testing participation and of liability insurance required; exemptions from licensing requirements; disposition of fees; free fishing weekend; free fishing day.

Any resident between the ages of sixteen (16) and sixty-five (65) years, as defined in Section 49-7-3, fishing in the marine waters of the state, shall obtain a saltwater sports fishing license for a fee of Ten Dollars ($10.00). A resident sixty-five (65) years of age or older, fishing in the marine waters of the state, shall obtain a lifetime saltwater sports fishing license for a one-time fee of Five Dollars ($5.00). These licenses shall be valid in any waters south of Interstate 10. Any resident citizen who is blind, paraplegic or a multiple amputee, or who has been adjudged by the Veterans Administration as having a total service-connected disability, or has been adjudged totally disabled by the Social Security Administration shall not be required to purchase or have in his possession a saltwater sports fishing license while engaged in such activities. Any resident exempt under this section shall have on his person while fishing proof of residency and age or disability. Any resident who is a member of the Armed Forces, including the Reserves and National Guard, and on active duty outside the State of Mississippi is not required to purchase or have in his possession a hunting or fishing license while engaged in such activities on leave from active duty. Such resident shall have in his possession and on his person such proof as may be required by the commission.

The commission shall prescribe the forms, types and fees for nonresident saltwater sports fishing licenses except that the fee for a nonresident saltwater sports fishing license shall not be less than Twenty Dollars ($20.00). This minimum fee shall not apply to nonresidents sixty-five (65) years of age or older. The commission may enter into reciprocal agreements with adjacent states pertaining to fees and exemptions for persons sixty-five (65) years of age or older. The commission shall require a nonresident to purchase a nonresident freshwater fishing license and a nonresident saltwater sports fishing license if the nonresident’s state requires both licenses for a nonresident to fish in its marine waters. Any nonresident sixty-five (65) years of age or older shall possess a saltwater sports fishing license.

All resident vessels engaged in charter boat fishing, party boat fishing, head boat and guide boat fishing shall be issued a separate annual license by the commission at a fee of Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00). All nonresident vessels engaged in charter boat fishing, party boat fishing, head boat and guide boat fishing shall be issued a separate annual license by the commission. In addition to other requirements for charter license eligibility, captains must show proof of participation in a Department of Transportation approved random drug testing program and proof of liability insurance as a charter boat captain. Crew members and customers of the licensed vessels shall not be required to purchase an individual resident or nonresident saltwater fishing license while sponsored by the licensed vessels. An operator of a licensed vessel shall be required to report the number of customers to the department as required by the commission and the information shall be kept confidential and shall not be released, except to other fisheries management agencies or as statistical data. All nonresident vessels engaged in saltwater sport fishing tournaments, not to exceed an aggregate of twenty (20) days per calendar year, shall not be required to purchase an annual license as provided under this subsection.

The saltwater sports fishing license is required for all recreational methods of finfish harvest.

Any resident who purchases a lifetime sportsman’s license, in accordance with Section 49-7-153, shall be entitled to fish in the marine salt waters of the state and shall be exempt from the purchase of a sport saltwater fishing license.

Any person authorized to issue a license may collect and retain, for each saltwater fishing license issued, the additional fee authorized under Section 49-7-17.

The fees collected from the sale of resident and nonresident saltwater sports fishing licenses shall be deposited into the Seafood Fund and shall be used solely for the management of marine resources.

Participants in the Very Special Fishing Olympics are exempt from this section.

The first weekend of “National Fishing and Boating Week” in June of each year is designated as “Free Fishing Weekend,” and July 4 of each year is designated as “Free Saltwater Sports Fishing Day.” Any person may saltwater sport fish without a license on “Free Saltwater Sports Fishing Day” and during “Free Fishing Weekend.”

The department may exempt participants in an organized fishing event conducted by a qualified nonprofit charitable, governmental or civic organization from the requirements of this section for one (1) day per year if the organization files an exemption application with the department and the application is approved by the department.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 578, § 8; Laws, 1995, ch. 454, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 348, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 602, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 426, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 431, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 477, § 3; Laws, 2008, ch. 474, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 482, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 380, § 1; Laws, 2011, ch. 417, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 16, 2011.).

§ 49-15-315.
Unlawful to engage in commercial harvesting of crabs, oysters, shrimp, bait shrimp or saltwater fish in certain marine waters; exceptions; Gulf Coast Research Laboratory to study estuaries and bays deemed to be nurseries; department to set limits on all catches for noncommercial use; penalties.

It is unlawful for any person, firm or corporation to engage in commercial harvesting of crabs, oysters, shrimp, bait shrimp or saltwater fish in the marine waters north of the CSX bridge in the three (3) coastal counties, except for the following:

A person may take any euryhaline species of minnow; and

A licensed commercial oyster fisherman may harvest oysters from reefs approved by the commission.

The Gulf Coast Research Laboratory shall study all estuaries and bays deemed to be nurseries. The Gulf Coast Research Laboratory may recommend the establishment of nursery grounds in the estuaries and bays if necessary to protect the state’s fishing resources.

The department shall set the limits on all catches for noncommercial use.

A person, firm or corporation found guilty of violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined as provided in Section 49-15-100(2), or imprisoned not more than three (3) months or both; and in addition, the commission shall seize and confiscate all commercial nets, trawls, traps, tongs and boats used for such purpose and dispose of it at public sale and shall deposit the proceeds to the credit of the Seafood Fund. If the person in possession of or using the nets in the violation is not the owner or licensee of the nets, the department shall notify the owner or licensee of the nets. The nets shall be subject to forfeiture unless the nets were stolen and prosecution for the theft is initiated.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 578, § 9; Laws, 1997, ch. 379, § 3; Laws, 1997, ch. 601, § 6; Laws, 2011, ch. 326, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 328, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 49-15-317.
Certain charter or recreational fishing boats authorized to fillet certain fish at sea.

Any charter or recreational fishing boat in the Gulf of Mexico over twenty-four (24) hours before returning to land may fillet any fish caught by its charter or recreational fishermen. The commission shall not adopt any rule or ordinance prohibiting or unduly restricting the filleting of fish by such charter or recreational fishing boats.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 578, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 49-15-319.
Filing float plan; effect of failure to file.

Any charter or recreational fishing boat which will be in the Gulf of Mexico over twenty-four (24) hours shall file a float plan with the department prior to departure.

If a float plan is not filed, the fish on such boat shall not be filleted.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 578, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 49-15-321.
Commission authorized to establish sanctuaries and nursery grounds; unlawful to engage in prohibited activity in designated sanctuary or nursery area.

The commission is hereby authorized to establish sanctuaries to protect the state’s fishing resources. The establishment of a sanctuary shall be based on overall public interest and prudent fisheries management and research. The commission shall establish nursery grounds in the estuaries and bays sufficient to protect the state’s fishing resources.

It shall be unlawful to engage in any activity prohibited by the commission in a designated sanctuary or nursery area.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 578, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1994.

§ 49-15-323.
Commission to have jurisdiction over certain violations of marine resources law or regulations committed in the Gulf of Mexico outside state’s territorial waters.

If any violation of any marine resources law or regulation is alleged to have been committed in the Gulf of Mexico outside of the state’s territorial waters where the state has jurisdiction over the recreational or commercial fishing vessel, under the Magnuson-Stevens Fishery Conservation and Management Act, 16 USCS Section 1856, or any other provision of federal law, the Commission on Marine Resources shall have jurisdiction of the offense and may commence administrative enforcement action against alleged violators in accordance with the administrative procedures provisions of Section 49-15-401 et seq.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2008, ch. 372, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2008.

§ 49-15-325.
Suspension or revocation of license.

The commission is authorized to suspend any license issued to any person under this chapter for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153. The procedure for suspension of a license for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a license suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be. If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control.

If a person does not comply with a summons or a citation or does not pay a fine, fee or assessment for violating a seafood law or regulation, the commission may revoke the applicable license of that person. When a person does not comply or fails to pay, the clerk of the court shall notify the person in writing by first-class mail that if the person does not comply or pay within ten (10) days from the date of mailing, the court will notify the commission and the commission will revoke the license of that person. The cost of notice may be added to other court costs. If the person does not comply or pay as required, the court clerk shall immediately mail a copy of the court record and a copy of the notice to the commission. After receiving notice from the court, the commission shall revoke the applicable license of that person.

A person whose license has been revoked under subsection (2) of this section shall remain revoked until the person can show proof that all obligations of the court have been met.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2015, ch. 393, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 18, 2015).